Missouri, session 2026, SB1130.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 173.460, to read as
follows:
173.460. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "H-1B visa", the nonimmigrant classification
authorized under 8 U.S.C. Section 1101(a)(15)(H)(i)(b),
based on a petition approved by the United States
Citizenship and Immigration Services, that permits an
employer to temporarily employ foreign workers in specialty
occupations requiring theoretical or technical expertise in
specialized fields such as information technology,
engineering, or finance, subject to statutory caps, labor
condition application requirements, and a maximum duration
of generally six years, including extensions;
(2) "State college or university", any public
community college, public college, or public university
located in the state of Missouri.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, a state college or university shall not:

SB 1130 2
(1) Employ any individual who possesses an H-1B visa;
or
(2) Enter into a contract with, or otherwise engage
the services of, any contractor that is owned by an
individual who possesses an H-1B visa or that employs an
individual who possesses an H-1B visa.
3. The department of higher education and workforce
development may promulgate rules to implement the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓